Washington statutes.
RCW 19.186.050

Violation—Consumer protection act.

The legislature finds and declares that a violation of this chapter substantially affects the public interest and is an unfair and deceptive act or practice and unfair method of competition in the conduct of trade or commerce as set forth under chapter 19.86 RCW.

[ 1994 c 285 s 6.]